_Full_Tex/texmf/tex/generic/hyphen/skhyph.tex
\patterns{
 % samohl\'asky
a1
\'a1
\"a1
e1
\'e1
i1
\'i1
o1
\'o1
\^o1
u1
\'u1
y1
\'y1
i2a
i2\'a
i2e
i2u
o2u
c2h
d2z
d2\v z
 % dvojice spoluhl\'asok
2b1b
2b1c
2b1\v c
2b1d
2b1\v d
2b1f
2b1g
2b1h
2b1c2h
2b1j
2b1k
2b1l
2b1\v l
2b1m
2b1n
2b1\v n
2b1p
2b1r
2b1s
2b1\v s
2b1t
2b1\v t
2b1v
2b1w
2b1x
2b1z
2b1\v z
2b1d2z
2b1d2\v z
2c1b
2c1c
2c1\v c
2c1d
2c1\v d
2c1f
2c1g
2c1c2h
2c1j
2c1k
2c1l
2c1\v l
2c1m
2c1n
2c1\v n
2c1p
2c1r
2c1s
2c1\v s
2c1t
2c1\v t
2c1v
2c1w
2c1x
2c1z
2c1\v z
2c1d2z
2c1d2\v z
2\v c1b
2\v c1c
2\v c1\v c
2\v c1d
2\v c1\v d
2\v c1f
2\v c1g
2\v c1h
2\v c1c2h
2\v c1j
2\v c1k
2\v c1l
2\v c1\v l
2\v c1m
2\v c1n
2\v c1\v n
2\v c1p
2\v c1r
2\v c1s
2\v c1\v s
2\v c1t
2\v c1\v t
2\v c1v
2\v c1w
2\v c1x
2\v c1z
2\v c1\v z
2\v c1d2z
2\v c1d2\v z
2d1b
2d1c
2d1\v c
2d1d
2d1\v d
2d1f
2d1g
2d1h
2d1c2h
2d1j
2d1k
2d1l
2d1\v l
2d1m
2d1n
2d1\v n
2d1p
2d1r
2d1s
2d1\v s
2d1t
2d1\v t
2d1v
2d1d2z
2d1d2\v z
2\v d1b
2\v d1c
2\v d1\v c
2\v d1d
2\v d1\v d
2\v d1f
2\v d1g
2\v d1h
2\v d1c2h
2\v d1j
2\v d1k
2\v d1l
2\v d1\v l
.as4t4ro3
.atmo3
.a2u1to3
2\v d1m
2\v d1n
2\v d1\v n
2\v d1p
2\v d1r
2\v d1s
2\v d1\v s
2\v d1t
2\v d1\v t
2\v d1v
2\v d1z
2\v d1\v z
2\v d1d2z
2\v d1d2\v z
2f1b
2f1c
2f1\v c
2f1d
2f1\v d
2f1f
2f1g
2f1h
2f1c2h
2f1j
2f1k
2f1l
2f1\v l
2f1m
2f1n
2f1\v n
2f1p
2f1r
2f1s
2f1\v s
2f1t
2f1\v t
2f1v
2f1z
2f1\v z
2f1d2z
2f1d2\v z
2g1b
2g1c
2g1\v c
2g1d
2g1\v d
2g1f
2g1g
2g1h
2g1c2h
2g1j
2g1k
2g1l
2g1\v l
2g1m
2g1n
2g1\v n
2g1p
2g1r
2g1s
2g1\v s
2g1t
2g1\v t
2g1v
2g1z
2g1\v z
2g1d2z
2g1d2\v z
2h1b
2h1c
2h1\v c
2h1d
2h1\v d
2h1f
2h1g
2h1h
2h1c2h
2h1j
2h1k
2h1l
2h1\v l
2h1m
2h1n
2h1\v n
2h1p
2h1r
2h1s
2h1\v s
2h1t
2h1\v t
2h1v
2h1z
2h1\v z
2h1d2z
2h1d2\v z
2c2h1b
2c2h1c
2c2h1\v c
2c2h1d
2c2h1\v d
2c2h1f
2c2h1g
2c2h1h
2c2h1c2h
2c2h1j
2c2h1k
2c2h1l
2c2h1\v l
2c2h1m
2c2h1n
2c2h1\v n
2c2h1p
2c2h1r
2c2h1s
2c2h1\v s
2c2h1t
2c2h1\v t
2c2h1v
2c2h1w
2c2h1\v z
2c2h1d2z
2c2h1d2\v z
2j1b
2j1c
2j1\v c
2j1d
2j1\v d
2j1f
2j1g
2j1h
2j1c2h
2j1j
2j1k
2j1l
2j1\v l
2j1m
2j1n
2j1\v n
2j1p
2j1r
2j1s
2j1\v s
2j1t
2j1\v t
2j1v
2j1w
2j1x
2j1z
2j1\v z
2j1d2z
2j1d2\v z
2k1b
2k1c
2k1\v c
2k1d
2k1\v d
2k1f
2k1g
2k1h
2k1c2h
2k1j
2k1k
2k1l
2k1\v l
2k1m
2k1n
2k1\v n
2k1p
2k1r
2k1s
2k1\v s
2k1t
2k1\v t
2k1v
2k1w
2k1x
2k1z
2k1\v z
2k1d2z
2k1d2\v z
2l1b
2l1c
2l1\v c
2l1d
2l1\v d
2l1f
2l1g
2l1h
2l1c2h
2l1j
2l1k
2l1l
2l1\v l
2l1m
2l1n
2l1\v n
2l1p
2l1r
2l1s
2l1\v s
2l1t
2l1\v t
2l1v
2l1z
2l1\v z
2l1d2z
2l1d2\v z
2\v l1b
2\v l1c
2\v l1\v c
2\v l1d
2\v l1\v d
2\v l1f
2\v l1g
2\v l1h
2\v l1c2h
2\v l1j
2\v l1k
2\v l1l
2\v l1\v l
2\v l1m
2\v l1n
2\v l1\v n
2\v l1p
2\v l1r
2\v l1s
2\v l1\v s
2\v l1t
2\v l1\v t
2\v l1v
2\v l1z
2\v l1\v z
2\v l1d2z
2\v l1d2\v z
2m1b
2m1c
2m1\v c
2m1d
2m1\v d
2m1f
2m1g
2m1h
2m1c2h
2m1j
2m1k
2m1l
2m1\v l
2m1m
2m1n
2m1\v n
2m1p
2m1r
2m1s
2m1\v s
2m1t
2m1\v t
2m1v
2m1z
2m1\v z
2m1d2z
2m1d2\v z
2n1b
2n1c
2n1\v c
2n1d
2n1\v d
2n1f
2n1g
2n1h
2n1c2h
2n1j
2n1k
2n1l
2n1\v l
2n1m
2n1n
2n1\v n
2n1p
2n1r
2n1s
2n1\v s
2n1t
2n1\v t
2n1v
2n1w
2n1x
2n1z
2n1\v z
2n1d2z
2n1d2\v z
2\v n1b
2\v n1c
2\v n1\v c
2\v n1d
2\v n1\v d
2\v n1f
2\v n1g
2\v n1h
2\v n1c2h
2\v n1j
2\v n1k
2\v n1l
2\v n1\v l
2\v n1m
2\v n1n
2\v n1\v n
2\v n1p
2\v n1r
2\v n1s
2\v n1\v s
2\v n1t
2\v n1\v t
2\v n1v
2\v n1z
2\v n1\v z
2\v n1d2z
2\v n1d2\v z
2p1b
2p1c
2p1\v c
2p1d
2p1\v d
2p1f
2p1g
2p1h
2p1c2h
2p1j
2p1k
2p1l
2p1\v l
2p1m
2p1n
2p1\v n
2p1p
2p1r
2p1s
2p1\v s
2p1t
2p1\v t
2p1v
2p1w
2p1x
2p1z
2p1\v z
2p1d2z
2p1d2\v z
2r1b
2r1c
2r1\v c
2r1d
2r1\v d
2r1f
2r1g
2r1h
2r1c2h
2r1j
2r1k
2r1l
2r1\v l
2r1m
2r1n
2r1\v n
2r1p
2r1r
2r1s
2r1\v s
2r1t
2r1\v t
2r1v
2r1w
2r1x
2r1z
2r1\v z
2r1d2z
2r1d2\v z
2s1b
2s1c
2s1\v c
2s1d
2s1\v d
2s1f
2s1g
2s1h
2s1c2h
2s1j
2s1k
2s1l
2s1\v l
2s1m
2s1n
2s1\v n
2s1p
2s1r
2s1s
2s1\v s
2s1t
2s1\v t
2s1v
2s1z
2s1\v z
2s1d2z
2s1d2\v z
2\v s1b
2\v s1c
2\v s1\v c
2\v s1d
2\v s1\v d
2\v s1f
2\v s1g
2\v s1h
2\v s1c2h
2\v s1j
2\v s1k
2\v s1l
2\v s1\v l
2\v s1m
2\v s1n
2\v s1\v n
2\v s1p
2\v s1r
2\v s1s
2\v s1\v s
2\v s1t
2\v s1\v t
2\v s1v
2\v s1w
2\v s1x
2\v s1z
2\v s1\v z
2\v s1d2z
2\v s1d2\v z
2t1b
2t1c
2t1\v c
2t1d
2t1\v d
2t1f
2t1g
2t1h
2t1c2h
2t1j
2t1k
2t1l
2t1\v l
2t1m
2t1n
2t1\v n
2t1p
2t1r
2t1s
2t1\v s
2t1t
2t1\v t
2t1v
2t1w
2t1x
2t1z
2t1\v z
2t1d2z
2t1d2\v z
2\v t1b
2\v t1c
2\v t1\v c
2\v t1d
2\v t1\v d
2\v t1f
2\v t1g
2\v t1h
2\v t1c2h
2\v t1j
2\v t1k
2\v t1l
2\v t1\v l
2\v t1m
2\v t1n
2\v t1\v n
2\v t1p
2\v t1r
2\v t1s
2\v t1\v s
2\v t1t
2\v t1\v t
2\v t1v
2\v t1w
2\v t1x
2\v t1z
2\v t1\v z
2\v t1d2z
2\v t1d2\v z
2v1b
2v1c
2v1\v c
2v1d
2v1\v d
2v1f
2v1g
2v1h
2v1c2h
2v1j
2v1k
2v1l
2v1\v l
2v1m
2v1n
2v1\v n
2v1p
2v1r
2v1s
2v1\v s
2v1t
2v1\v t
2v1v
2v1w
2v1x
2v1z
2v1\v z
2v1d2z
2v1d2\v z
2z1b
2z1c
2z1\v c
2z1d
2z1\v d
2z1f
2z1g
2z1h
2z1c2h
2z1j
2z1k
2z1l
2z1\v l
2z1m
2z1n
2z1\v n
2z1p
2z1r
2z1s
2z1\v s
2z1t
2z1\v t
2z1v
2z1z
2z1\v z
2z1d2z
2z1d2\v z
2\v z1b
2\v z1c
2\v z1\v c
2\v z1d
2\v z1\v d
2\v z1f
2\v z1g
2\v z1h
2\v z1c2h
2\v z1j
2\v z1k
2\v z1l
2\v z1\v l
2\v z1m
2\v z1n
2\v z1\v n
2\v z1p
2\v z1r
2\v z1s
2\v z1\v s
2\v z1t
2\v z1\v t
2\v z1v
2\v z1z
2\v z1\v z
2\v z1d2z
2\v z1d2\v z
2d2z1k
2d2z1n
2d2z1r
2d2z1s
2d2\v z1\v s
2x1t
2x1n
2b1\'r
2\'r1b
2d2z1\'r
2\'r1d2z
2d2z1\v l
2\'r1d2\v z
2d2\v z1\v l
 %2 samohl\'asky
a1\'i2
a1o2
e1\'a2
e1\'i2
e1o2
e1\'o2
e1u2
i1o2
o1a2
o1e2
o1i2
o1o2
u1a2
u1\'a2
u1i2
u1\'i2
u1o2
u1u2
y1a2
y1e2
y1\'o2
y1u2
a2u1
a2i1
 % 3 spoluhl\'asky
b2l3b
3b2l3\v c
b2l3c2h
3b2l3k
3b2\v l3k
3b2l3\v n
b2l3\v s
b2\v l3\v s
3b2r3b
b2r3d
3b2r3k
3b2\'r3k
3b2r3l
3b2\'r3\v l
3b2r3n
3b2r3\v n
3b2r3v
b2r3z
b3s2c
b3s2t
c3k2t
3c2r3\v c
3c2\'r3\v c
3c2r3k
3c2\'r3k
c3t2v
3\v c2l3n
3\v c2r3\v c
\v c2r3p
3\v c2r3t
3\v c2r3v
d3c4h4n
3d2l3b
3d2l3h
d2l3n
3d2l3\v z
3d2\v l3\v z
3d2r3d
3d2r3g
d2r3l
3d2r3k
3d2r3m
d2r3n
3d2r3v
3d2r3z
3d2r3\v z
3d2\'r3\v z
d3s2v
d3s2t
d3v2r
3f2r3\v c
3f2r3f
3f2r3k
3f2\'r3k
3f2r3m
3f2r3n
3g2l3g
3g2r3c
3g2r3g
3h2l3b
3h2\v l3b
3h2l3t
3h2m2l
3h2r3b
3h2\'r3b
3h2r3\v c
3h2r3d
3h2r3d2z
3h2r3k
3h2r3m
3h2r3n
3h2r3\v n
3h2r3t
3h2r3v
3c2h2l3p
3c2h2r3b
3c2h2r3\v c
c2h2r3c4h
3c2h2r3l
3c2h2r3t
j2c2h3n
j3s2t
j3\v s2le
j3t2m
j3t2r
3k2l3b
3k2\v l3b
3k2l3\v c
3k2l3z
3k2\v l3z
k2r3b
3k2r3\v c
3k2\'r3\v c
3k2\'r3d
3k2r3k
3k2\'r3k
3k2\'r3m
3k2r3p
3k2r3s
3k2r3t
3k2r3v
k3s2\v l
k2s3n
k3t2r
l3d2r
\v l3k2n
l3t2r
m3b2l
m3b2\v l
m3b2r
m3f2l
m3f2r
m3k2n
3m2l3\v c
3m2l3k
m3p2l
m3p2\v l
m3p2r
m3p2s
3m2r3h
m2r3c4h
3m2r3k
m2r3l
m2r3\v s
m2r3t
3m2r3v
3m2r3z
3m2\'r3z
m3s2t
m3\v s2t
n3d\v la
n3d2r
n3f2l
n3f2r
n3g2h
n3g2l
n3g2\v l
n2g3n
n3g2r
n3g2v
n3k2c
n3k2h
n3k2n
n3k2r
n3k2v
n3s2c
n3\v s2p
n3\v s2t
n3t2g
n3t2l
n3t2n
n3t2r
n2\v z3m
3p2l3n
3p2l3\v n
3p2\v l3\v n
3p2l3z
3p2\v l3z
3p2\v l3\v z
3p2\'r3c
3p2r3\v c
3p2r3d
3p2r3s
3p2r3\v s
p3\v s2\v t
p3t2r
r2b3n
r3g2\v l
r3g2r
r3g2s
r3k2d
r2k3n
r3k2t
r3k2v
r3p2c
r3p2\v c
r3p2r
r3s2p
r3\v s2\v c
r3\v s2l
r3\v s2r
r2t3m
r3t2n
r2t3\v n
r3t2r
r3t2v
3s4c4h4n
s2k3l
s2k3m
s2k3n
s3k2r
s3k2v
3s2l3n
3s2l3\v n
3s2l3z
s3p2r
3s2r3d
3s4\'r3k
3s4r3\v s
s3t2k
\^os4t3k2\'ar3s4t4v
s2t3l
s3t2m
s2t3n
s3t2r
s3t2v
s2\v t3h
s2\v t3m
s2\v t3p
\v s3k2l
\v s3k2r
\v s3t2r
3\v s4t4v
t3k2l
t3k2n
3t2l3\v c
3t2l3k
t3h2l
3t4r3\v c
3t4r3h
3t2r3l
3t2r3k
3t2r3m
a4t2r3n
3t2r3n
3t2\'r3n
3t2\'r3\v n
3t4r3p
3t2r3v
3t2\'r3\v z
3v2l3\v c
3v2\v l3\v c
3v2l3h
3v2l3k
3v2l3n
3v2r3h
3v2r3c2h
3v2r3l
3v2\'r3\v s
3v2\'r3t
3v2r3z
3v2\'r3z
3v4z4d
3v4z4h
3v4z4n
3v3z2\v t
z3d2n
noz5d4r
3z4d4r
3z4d4v
z3g2n
3z4h4r
3z2r3k
3z2r3n
3z4v4l
\v z2d3n
3\v z2l3\v c
3\v z2l3t
3\v z2\v lt
3\v z2r3\v d
\v z3s2t
x3p2l
x3p2r
x3t2r
 % 4 spoluhl\'asky
3b2l4\v c3n
3b2\v l4\v c3k
3b2l4n3k
3b2\v l3k2n
3b2r4b3l
3b2r4b3t
3b2r4\v c3k
3b2r4d3c
3b2\'r4d3n
3b2r3h2l
3b4\'r4k3n
3b4r4m3b
3b4r4n3\v c
3b4r4n3k
3b4r4\v s3l
3b4r4t3l
3b4r4t3n
3b4r4v3n
3b4r4z3d
3b4r4z3l
3b4r4z3n
b3s2t2r
3c4\'r4\v c3k
3c4r4k3n
3c4v4r3\v c
3c4v4r3k
3c4v4\'r3k
3c4v4r3l
3\v c4l4n3k
3\v c4r3\v c4r
3\v c4r4c4h3n
3\v c4r4p3k
3\v c4r4p3n
3\v c4r4t3n
3\v c4v4r3k
3\v c4v4r3l
3d4l4b3n
d4\v l4\v z3k
d4l4\v z3n
d4\v l4\v z3n
3d4r4c3n
3d4r4g3\v l
3d4r4g3n
3d4r4h3n
3d4r4n3\v c
3d4r4n3k
3d4r4s3n
3d4r4\v z3b
3d4r4\v z3k
3f4r4c3k
3f4r4c3n
3f4r4\v c3k
3f4r4f3l
3f4r4k3n
3f4r4n3d
3f4r4n3d4\v z
3f4r4n3g
3f4r4n3k
3g4l4g3n
3g2r4c3k
3h2\v l4b3k
3h2l3t4n
3h2r4b3\v c
3h2r4\v c3k
h2r4d3l
3h2r4g3\v l
3h2r4k3\v l
3h2r4k3n
3h2\'r4k3n
3h2r4n3\v c
3h2r4s3t
3h2r4s3\v t
3ch4\v l4p3k
3c2h2r4b3t
3c2h2r4c4h3l
3c2h2r4c4h3\v l
3c4h4r4s3t
j3s4t4r
j3s4t4v
3k4l4b3\v c
3k4l4b3k
3k4l4z3k
3k4l4z3n
3k4r4\v c3m
3k4r4\v c3n
3k4r4k3v
3k4r4m3n
3k4\'r4m3n
3k4r4p3\v c
3k4r4s3t
3k4r4\v s3t
3k4r4t3k
3k4r4v3n
3m2l4\v c3k
3m2\v l4k3n
3m2\v l4k3v
3m2l4s3n
m3p4r3p
m3p4r3v
3m4r4k3n
3m4r4k3v
3m4r4m3l
3m4r4n3\v c
3m4r4n3k
3m4\'r4\v s3t
3m4\'r4t3v
3m4r4z3l
3m4r4z3k
3m4r4z3n
n4g3s4t
n3\v s4t4r
n3t4l3m
3p2l4z3l
3p2\v l4z3n
p2\'r4c3n
3p2r4\v c3k
3p4r4d3n
3p4\'r4c2h3n
3p4r4s3k
3p4r4t3k
r2s3k4d
r2s3k4t
\v cer4s3t4v
3s4l4n3k
3s4k4r3z
3s4m4r3c
3s4m4r3\v c
3s4m4r3d
3s4m4r3k
3s4m4r3t
3s4p4r3c4h
3s4r4d3c
3s4r4k3n
3s4r4s3t
3s4t4\v l3k
s3t4r3b
ko4s3t4r3\v c
3s4t4r3\v c
3s4t4\'r3h
3s4t4r3k
s4t4r3v
4s4\v t5k4r\'at
3\v s4k4l3b
3\v s4k4r3k
3\v s4k4\'r3k
ma\v s3k4r3t
3\v s4k4r3t
3\v s4p4l3h
3\v s4t4r3b
\v s4t4r3n
3\v s4t4v4r3t
3\v s4t4v4r3\v t
3t2\v l4c3\v t
3t2r4b3l
t2r4\v c3k
3t2r4d3l
3t2r4h3l
3t2r4h3n
3t2r4k3n
3t2r4k3v
3t2r4m3n
3t4\'r4p3n
3t2r4\v z3k
3t2r4\v z3n
3t2v4r3d
3t2v4r3d4z
3t2v4\'r3d4z
3v2l4h3\v c
3v2l4h3k
3v2l4h3n
3v2l4n3k
3v2l4n3n
3v4r4h3n
3v4r4k3n
3v4\'r4z3g
3v4r4z3g
3v4r4z3n
3v4r4\v z3l
3z4h4\'r3\v n
3z4r4n3n
3\v z4l4\v c3n
3\v z4l4t3n
3\v z4r4d3k
 % 5 spoluhl\'asok
3b4r4n3k4n
b3d4\v l4\v z3n
3c4v4r4\v c3k
3c4v4r4n3k
3\v c4\'r4s3t4v
3\v c4r4t4t3n
3\v c4v4r4k3n
3d4r4\v z3g4r
3f4r4n4g3n
h2\'r4s3t4k
3c4h4r4s4t3n
3k4r4s4t3n
3k4r4s4t3\v n
3s4m4r4\v s3\v t
3s4m4r4t3k
s3t4r4n3k
3\v s4k4l4b3n
ma\v s3k4r4t3n
3\v s4k4r4t3n
3\v s4k4v4r3\v c
3\v s4k4v4r3k
3\v s4k4v4\'r3k
3\v s4k4v4r3n
3\v s4m4r4d3k
3\v s4m4r4n3c
3\v s4p4l4h3n
3\v s4t4r4k3n
3\v s3t4r4n3g
3t4v4r4d3n
3v4r4s3t4v
3v4r4z3g4n
 % 6 spoluhl\'asok
3c4v4r4n3g4n
3\v s4k4v4r4k3n
3\v s4k4v4\'r4k3n
 % koncovka -n\'y
k4\v c3n\'y.
k4\v c3n\'eho.
k4\v c3n\'emu.
k4\v c3nom.
k4\v c3n\'ym.
k4\v c3n\'e.
k4\v c3n\'a.
k4\v c3nej.
k4\v c3n\'u.
k4\v c3nou.
k4\v c3n\'i.
k4\v c3n\'ych.
k4\v c3n\'ymi.
k4t3n\'y.
k4t3n\'eho.
k4t3n\'emu.
k4t3nom.
k4t3n\'ym.
k4t3n\'e.
k4t3n\'a.
k4t3nej.
k4t3n\'u.
k4t3nou.
k4t3n\'i.
k4t3n\'ych.
k4t3n\'ymi.
n4\v c3n\'y.
n4\v c3n\'eho.
n4\v c3n\'emu.
n4\v c3nom.
n4\v c3n\'ym.
n4\v c3n\'e.
n4\v c3n\'a.
n4\v c3nej.
n4\v c3n\'u.
n4\v c3nou.
n4\v c3n\'i.
n4\v c3n\'ych.
n4\v c3n\'ymi.
n4k4\v c3n
n4t3n\'y.
n4t3n\'eho.
n4t3n\'emu.
n4t3nom.
n4t3n\'ym.
n4t3n\'e.
n4t3n\'a.
n4t3nej.
n4t3n\'u.
n4t3nou.
n4t3n\'i.
n4t3n\'ych.
n4t3n\'ymi.
r4d3n\'y.
r4d3n\'eho.
r4d3n\'emu.
r4d3nom.
r4d3n\'ym.
r4d3n\'e.
r4d3n\'a.
r4d3nej.
r4d3n\'u.
r4d3nou.
r4d3n\'i.
r4d3n\'ych.
r4d3n\'ymi.
r4m3n\'y.
r4m3n\'eho.
r4m3n\'emu.
r4m3nom.
r4m3n\'ym.
r4m3n\'e.
r4m3n\'a.
r4m3nej.
r4m3n\'u.
r4m3nou.
r4m3n\'i.
r4m3n\'ych.
r4m3n\'ymi.
r4p4\v c3n
r4t3n\'y.
r4t3n\'eho.
r4t3n\'emu.
r4t3nom.
r4t3n\'ym.
r4t3n\'e.
r4t3n\'a.
r4t3nej.
r4t3n\'u.
r4t3nou.
r4t3n\'i.
r4t3n\'ych.
r4t3n\'ymi.
s4t3n\'y.
s4t3n\'eho.
s4t3n\'emu.
s4t3nom.
s4t3n\'ym.
s4t3n\'e.
s4t3n\'a.
s4t3nej.
s4t3n\'u.
s4t3nou.
s4t3n\'i.
s4t3n\'ych.
s4t3n\'ymi.
z4d3ny.
z4d3neho.
z4d3nemu.
z4d3nom.
z4d3nym.
z4d3ne.
z4d3na.
z4d3nej.
z4d3nu.
z4d3nou.
z4d3ni.
z4d3nych.
z4d3nymi.
z4d3n\'y.
z4d3n\'eho.
z4d3n\'emu.
z4d3n\'ym.
z4d3n\'e.
z4d3n\'a.
z4d3n\'u.
z4d3n\'i.
z4d3n\'ych.
z4d3n\'ymi.
 % koncovky -ka
b2l4\v s3k
l2t3k2a.
l2t3k2y.
l2t3k2e.
l2t3k2u.
l2t3k2ou.
l2t3k2\'am.
l2t3k2\'ach.
l2t3k2a1mi.
n2t3k2a.
n2t3k2y.
n2t3k2e.
n2t3k2u.
n2t3k2ou.
n2t3k2\'am.
n2t3k2\'ach.
n2t3k2a1mi.
n2k2t3k
p2t3k2a.
p2t3k2y.
p2t3k2e.
p2t3k2u.
p2t3k2ou.
p2t3k2\'am.
p2t3k2\'ach.
p2t3k2a1mi.
s2t3k2a.
s2t3k2y.
s2t3k2e.
s2t3k2u.
s2t3k2ou.
s2t3k2\'am.
s2t3k2\'ach.
s2t3k2a1mi.
 % koncovka -ty
5p4r4s3t
 % koncovka -sk\'y,-sky
b3s4k
d3s4k
j3s4k
l4p3s4k
l3s4k
\v l3s4k
l4t3s4k
4m3s4k
4m4p3s4k
n4d3s4k
n4k4t3s4k
n3s4k
n4t3s4k
p3s4k
p4t3s4k
r3s4k
r4t3s4k
r4z5s4k
5s4r4b3s4k
\v s3s4k
t3s4k
v3s4k
z3s4k
\v z3s4k
 % koncovky -\v stina,-\v cina
n2d3\v c
z3\v s2t2
r4z3\v s2t2
 % koncovky -stvo
b3s4t4v
\v c3s4t4v
d3s4t4v
